Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-962
Contract of
employment; contents.

Every contract of employment with a school employee shall
specify (1) the contractual
period of employment, including the starting and ending dates of the contract,
and (2) that it is subject to the provisions of the School Employees
Retirement Act.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 36, p. 650;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2936;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 469, p. 852;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1535;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 597;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 27;

Laws 2013, LB263, § 20.